Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB373.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part V of Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 43INFORMATION TECHNOLOGYSubchapterA. General Provisions (Reserved)C. SecuritySUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONS(Reserved)SUBCHAPTER CSECURITYSec.123456789101112131415161718 4351. Statewide security standards.4352. Security standards and risk assessments.4353. Assessment of compliance with security standards.4354. Joint Cybersecurity Oversight Committee.§ 4351. Statewide security standards.(a) Establishment.--(1) The Chief Information Officer within the Office of Administration shall establish a Statewide set of standards for information technology security to maximize the functionality, security and interoperability of the Commonwealth's distributed information technology assets, including:(i) Data classification.(ii) Management.(iii) Communications.(iv) Encryption technologies.(2) The standards under this subsection shall conform to the industry's best practices and standards regarding information technology security.(b) Review and revision.--The Chief Information Officer shall review and revise the security standards annually as necessary. As part of this function, the Chief Information Officer shall review periodically existing security standards and practices in place among the various State agencies to determine whether those standards and practices meet Statewide security and encryption requirements.(c) Assumption of responsibilities.--The Chief Information Officer may assume the direct responsibility of providing for the information technology security of a State agency that fails to adhere to security standards adopted under this chapter.20250SB0373PN0321 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4352. Security standards and risk assessments.(a) Authorization to operate.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all information technology security goods, software or services purchased using taxpayer money, or for use by a State agency or in a public facility, shall require an authorization to operate by the head of the State agency in accordance with security standards under this chapter. No information technology system or service may be operated by, or in support of, a State agency without an authorization to operate.(b) Standards.--The Chief Information Officer within the Office of Administration shall define a risk-based set of control standards that identify specific security and privacy protections for all information technology and information technology services in line with the specific threats and risks to the residents of this Commonwealth and State agency operations.(c) Assessments.--(1) The Chief Information Officer shall conduct risk assessments to identify compliance and operational and strategic risks to the information technology network and agency operations.(2) The assessments may include methods such as penetration testing, social-engineered security threats or similar assessment methodologies.(3) The Chief Information Officer may contract with another party to perform the assessments.(4) The following assessment reviews shall be performed prior to the information security audit under subsection (e) and the assessment shall be performed consistent with the 20250SB0373PN0321 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal information processing standards:(i) Identity management.(ii) Security incident management.(iii) Network perimeter security.(iv) Systems development.(v) Project management.(vi) Information technology risk management.(vii) Data management.(viii) Vulnerability management.(5) Detailed reports of the risk and security issues identified in the assessments shall be reported to the Chief Information Officer and shall be kept confidential.(6) The agency head, in consultation with the Office of Administration, shall identify corrective or mitigating actions as needed.(d) Interim authority to operate.--If the agency head determines that the information technology system or service is needed, the agency head may seek authorization from the Chief Information Officer for a period not longer than 180 days to implement the corrective or mitigating actions.(e) Security audit.--(1) The Chief Information Officer shall contract with an independent certified information security auditor or entity to perform an information security audit of State agencies.(2) The Chief Information Officer shall determine a schedule for continuous State agency information security audits.(f) Notification and audits.--(1) The party conducting the assessment or audit shall provide the Chief Information Officer and head of the 20250SB0373PN0321 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reviewed State agency with a detailed report of the security issues identified, which shall not be publicly disclosed.(2) The State agency, in cooperation with the Office of Administration, shall provide the Chief Information Officer with a corrective action plan that remediates issues identified in the detailed report under paragraph (1), which may not be publicly disclosed.(3) The Chief Information Officer shall issue a public report on the general results of the assessment that shall be accessible on the Office of Administration's publicly accessible Internet website.(g) Effect of section.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the Auditor General or the General Assembly from assessing the security practices of State information technology systems as part of its statutory duties and responsibilities.§ 4353. Assessment of compliance with security standards.(a) Frequency.--The Chief Information Officer within the Office of Administration shall biannually assess the ability of each State agency's contracted vendors to comply with the current security standards established under this chapter.(b) Contents.--The Chief Information Officer shall establish a quantifiable objective metric that measures the degree of compliance with current security standards. The assessment under this section shall, at a minimum:(1) Quantify the degree of compliance with the current security standards using the metric.(2) Include security organization, security practices, security information standards, network security architecture, systems development and lifecycle management 20250SB0373PN0321 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and current expenditures of State funds for information security.(3) Include an estimate of the cost to implement the security measures needed for State agencies to fully comply with the established standards.(c) Submittal of information.--A State agency shall submit information required by the Chief Information Officer for the assessments under this section.§ 4354. Joint Cybersecurity Oversight Committee.(a) Establishment and membership.--The Joint Cybersecurity Oversight Committee is established and shall consist of the following members:(1) The director.(2) The following individuals appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate:(i) Two members of the Senate.(ii) A representative of the Chief Clerk of the Senate.(iii) A representative from the Information Technology Office of the majority caucus of the Senate.(3) The following individuals appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate:(i) One member of the Senate.(ii) A representative from the Information Technology Office of the minority caucus of the Senate.(4) The following individuals appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives:(i) Two members of the House of Representatives.(ii) A representative of the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives.20250SB0373PN0321 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A representative from the Information Technology Office of the majority caucus of the House of Representatives.(5) The following individuals appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives:(i) One member of the House of Representatives.(ii) A representative from the Information Technology Office of the minority caucus of the House of Representatives.(6) The Attorney General or a designee of the Attorney General.(7) The Chief Information Officer of:(i) The Department of the Auditor General.(ii) The Treasury Department.(iii) The Office of Attorney General.(iv) The Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts.(v) The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.(8) Four private citizens appointed by the Governor with professional cybersecurity experience.(9) The Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police or a designee of the commissioner.(10) A member of the National Guard experienced in cybersecurity, as appointed by the Adjutant General.(11) The president of the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania or a designee of the president.(b) Chairperson and vice chairperson.--The chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the Governor, and the vice chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the chairperson.20250SB0373PN0321 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Staffing.--(1) The committee shall be staffed by the Office of Administration, which shall support and assist the committee.(2) Costs incurred for mileage for a member shall be reimbursed by the individual or entity appointing the member.(d) Service of members.--Each member of the committee shall serve at the pleasure of the individual who appointed the member.(e) Vacancies.--A vacancy in the membership of the committee shall be filled by the appointing authority in the same manner as the original appointment.(f) Meetings.--(1) The committee shall meet at least on a quarterly basis and no later than the first Thursday of each quarter.(2) The chairperson of the committee, with the consent of the vice chairperson of the committee, may schedule additional meetings of the committee.(3) The chairperson of the committee shall provide the members of the committee with notice of the time and location of each meeting of the committee no later than one week prior to the meeting. Notice shall also be provided to the Governor, the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) Notice of the meetings of the committee shall be provided by regular mail and email.(5) A member of the committee may participate in a meeting of the committee in person, by teleconference, by video conference or by other means as agreed to by the chairperson and vice chairperson of the committee.(6) A meeting of the committee shall be subject to 65 20250SB0373PN0321 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(7) Executive sessions may be held in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. § 708 (relating to executive sessions) and may be held to discuss, plan or review matters and records that are deemed necessary for emergency preparedness, protection of public safety and security of all property in a manner that, if disclosed, would be reasonably likely to jeopardize or threaten public safety or preparedness or public protection.(g) Duties.--(1) The committee shall review and coordinate cybersecurity policies and discuss emerging cybersecurity threats, recommended policy changes and assess current cybersecurity within this Commonwealth.(2) The committee shall prepare a report of its activities, which shall be transmitted to the following:(i) The Governor.(ii) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(iii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(iv) The Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the Senate.(v) The Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(vi) The Court Administrator of Pennsylvania.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Committee." The Joint Cybersecurity Oversight Committee established under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0373PN0321 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829